Utah statutes.
76-10-506.   Threatening with or using dangerous weapon in fight or quarrel.
Every person, except those persons described in Section 76-10-503, who, not in
necessary self defense in the presence of two or more persons, draws or
exhibits any dangerous weapon in an angry and threatening manner or unlawfully
uses the same in any fight or quarrel is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
